District of Columbia statutes.
31-3254

Regulations.

The Commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-96, § 104, 49 DCR 991

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3255.